Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.690

Property division obligations—Obligee entitled to statement of obligor's retirement benefits—When.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, following both the initial and final postretirement audit of an obligor's retirement benefit, the department shall provide an obligee entitled to direct payment of retirement benefits pursuant to a dissolution order under RCW 41.50.670 with a statement of monthly retirement benefit allowance to be paid to the obligor, and other retirement benefit information available to the obligor including the average final compensation, total years of service, retirement date, the amount of the employee contributions made prior to implementation of employer pickup under RCW 41.04.445 and 41.04.450, and savings and interest.

[ 1991 c 365 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.